Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-15,162
Fees on tires; collection; disbursement.

(1) There is hereby imposed a fee of one dollar on each tire of every
new motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer sold at retail in this state. Such
fee shall be collected by the county treasurer at the time of registration
of the motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer and remitted to the Department
of Revenue.

(2) There is hereby imposed a fee of one dollar on every tire sold at
retail in this state, including every farm tractor tire, which tires are not
on a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section. Such fee shall be collected from the purchaser by the tire retailer
at the time of purchase and shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue.

(3) For purposes of this section, tire shall have the definition found
in section 81-15,159.02 and shall include a pneumatic and solid tire but shall
not include a recapped or regrooved tire.

(4) Subject to section 81-15,165, the fees remitted to the Department
of Revenue under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund. Fees collected
in excess of one million dollars shall be available for grants to political
subdivisions under rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (6)(b)(i) of section 13-2042.

Laws 1990, LB 163, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1034, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 592, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB29, § 3.